Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 4. Assessments

Cross references. —

As to taxes and assessments in connection with water conservancy districts, see §§

41-3-770

through

41-3-779

.

As to taxes and assessments in connection with irrigation and drainage districts generally, see §§

41-6-501

through

41-6-507

.

As to district commissioners generally, see §§

41-7-301

through

41-7-318

.

As to assessments, etc., generally in connection with drainage districts, see §§

41-9-240

through

41-9-259

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

§ 41-7-401.
Payment in installments; construction contracts with United States generally; default in payments as lien; exception; power of commissioners to enforce payment.

At the time of the confirmation of any assessment provided for in this article, it shall be competent for the court to order the same to be paid in installments of such amount and at such time as will be convenient for the accomplishment of the purposes for which such assessment was made, and the payment of the principal and interest of such notes or bonds of said district as the court shall grant authority to issue, such installments to become delinquent on the same date or dates as may be fixed by law for state and county taxes to become delinquent, and such installments shall draw interest from the date of any notes or bonds issued by the district and for the payment of which said assessments are pledged at such rates not to exceed seven percent (7%) per annum, as may be fixed by the court; provided, however, that it shall be competent for the court, in case a contract is made between the United States of America and an irrigation district for the construction or sale of irrigation works and water rights, to order the charges to be paid in accordance with the provisions of an act of congress approved December 5, 1924, entitled: “An act making appropriations to supply deficiencies in certain appropriations for the fiscal year ended June 30, 1924, and prior fiscal years; to provide supplemental appropriations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 1925; and for other purposes,” and all acts that may be hereafter enacted as amendatory thereof or supplemental thereto, and in such installments as fixed by contract between the district and the United States. The annual levy for payment of construction charges on the basis herein authorized shall continue to be made each year against each tract of land in the district against which benefits under such contract with the United States have been apportioned, until the full amount apportioned against the same has been paid; such installments to become delinquent on the same date or dates as may be fixed by law for state and county taxes to become delinquent and such installments, after they become due, shall draw interest at six percent (6%) per annum. All assessments provided for in this article, together with all interest thereon and all penalties for default in payment of same, and all costs of collecting the same shall, from the date of the order of court confirming such assessments until paid, constitute a perpetual lien in an amount not in excess of the benefits severally assessed, upon all the land and other property against which such assessments shall be levied, superior to all liens of every kind and nature whatsoever except the paramount lien of the state for the general state, county, city, town or school taxes, and no sale of such property to enforce any general state, county, municipal, or school tax, or other lien shall extinguish the perpetual lien of such assessments; and such assessments shall also be a lien upon all equities or interests in existing water appropriations for the irrigation of said lands when the title to said lands is vested in the United States, and when said water appropriations have attached to said lands. The commissioner shall have the power to enforce payment of such assessments, and all assessments by them duly levied and confirmed, by shutting off the supply of water to any and all lands upon which assessments are due and unpaid, and may refuse to deliver water to such lands until such assessments are paid. Any person having an interest in land assessed for construction may at any time within thirty (30) days after the confirmation of said report, pay to the court the amount of the assessment against his land or any tract thereof. Said payment shall relieve said land and water rights from the lien of said assessments for the cost of construction; provided, however, that any district organized within a federal irrigation project for co-operation between such districts and the United States, may contract and agree in connection with the acquisition of irrigation works and water rights and the taking over of the care, operation and control of the same from the United States, that each tract or parcel of land shall pay the charges conformed in the assessments against such tract or parcel of land, and that liability for charges thus assessed may by contract be conformed and limited to the particular tract or parcel of land in question and if so contracted, shall not be imposed as a charge or incumbrance upon other parcels or tracts of land within the district.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, §§ 38, 39; C.S. 1920, § 973; Laws 1923, ch. 14, § 1; 1925, ch. 52, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-723; Laws 1937, ch. 77, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-823; W.S. 1957, § 41-301.

Cross references. —

See also §

41-7-303

as to power of district commissioners, relative to contracts and cooperation with United States generally.

As to construction contracts with United States generally, see §§

41-7-601

through

41-7-603

.

As to definition of “the assessment roll,” see §

41-7-305

.

As to issuance of interest-bearing warrants by irrigation commissioners, see §

41-7-501

et seq.

As to interest rates generally, see § 40-14-106(e).

Editor's notes. —

For those sections of the act of congress referred to above that remain unrepealed, see 43 U.S.C. §§ 371, 376, 377, 396, 412, 417, 433, 462, 466, 478, 493, 494, 500, 501, 526. See also 43 U.S.C. § 511.

Surplus water. —

Statute contemplates that district may dispose of surplus water since all available water supply should be used as far as possible. In re Greybull Valley Irrigation Dist., 52 Wyo. 479, 76 P.2d 339,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 52 Wyo. 479, 76 P.2d 339,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1938).

Injunction. —

Where county may disallow claim for the expense of advertising a tax sale of irrigation district land and set up complete defense to an action brought thereon, injunction to restrain treasurer from advertising such sale is unnecessary. Board of Comm'rs v. Featherstone, 26 Wyo. 1, 174 P. 192,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1918).

Cited

in

Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1926); Lincoln Land Co. v. Goshen Irrigation Dist., 42 Wyo. 229, 293 P. 373,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(1930).

§ 41-7-402.
Due dates; annual budget of district; hearings on budget; petition for additional funds; hearings on petition.

Assessments to meet expenses of any current year of any district shall become due, payable and delinquent at such time or times each year as may be fixed by law for state and county taxes to become due, payable and delinquent. Commissioners having charge of any irrigation district shall on or before the first Tuesday of June of each year file with the clerk of the court having jurisdiction of such district, a report showing an itemized estimate of the money to be raised by assessment within the district for the purpose of constructing new work, maintenance and to meet the yearly current expenses of the district. In addition to the amount above provided, the commissioners may add a sum which in their judgment shall be sufficient to provide for possible delinquencies. Within thirty (30) days after filing such annual report, at a time and place to be fixed by the court or a judge thereof, the judge shall examine such report, hear all objections thereto, fix and determine the amount to be raised by assessments for the current year and cause such adjudication to be entered of record in said court and a certified copy thereof to be delivered to the commissioners of such district. The commissioners shall add thereto such amount as may be necessary to meet the principal and interest on lawful indebtedness of the district maturing during the current year, together with a sum which in their judgment shall be sufficient to provide for possible delinquencies. When thus completed it shall be known as “the budget of . . . . . district for the year (year)” and also be verified under oath by any one (1) of the commissioners.

The commissioners of any irrigation district within the state of Wyoming are hereby forbidden to incur any indebtedness for current expenses of the district in excess of the amount provided in the budget. Provided, however, in case a greater sum than that provided in the budget is required, the commissioners may file a petition setting forth the causes therefor, with the clerk of the court having jurisdiction of said district. Immediately upon the filing of said petition the court shall make an order fixing the time and place of hearing and directing the form and manner of notice thereof to be given if the court deem such hearing advisable. If the court shall authorize the expenditure of a greater sum of money the commissioners shall be authorized to incur indebtedness equal to the amount of the additional sum authorized by the court, and in case the expenditure occurs at a time when it is too late to place the amount upon the assessment roll for the current year such amounts may be added to the budget of ensuing years. All debts contracted in contravention of this section shall be void.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 14, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 122-724; C.S. 1945, § 71-824; W.S. 1957, § 41-302; Laws 1999, ch. 150, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to additional assessments generally, see §

41-7-405

.

Originally, even the cost
of maintenance was within the provisions of §

41-7-201

so
as to require the filing of the report under
§

41-7-305

. In 1923 the legislature revised § 973, C.S. 1920 (now
§

41-7-401

), and added the section with is now
§

41-7-402

, providing for the filing with the court of an “itemized
estimate of the money to be raised by assessment within the district
for the purpose of constructing new work, maintenance and to meet
the yearly current expenses of the district.” Such additional provision
in effect eliminated the “expenses of any current year” from the requirements
of
§§

41-7-201

,

41-7-305

.Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Short, 80 Wyo. 136, 339 P.2d 403,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1959).

The words “new work” used
in the statute (§§

41-7-101

through

41-7-415

) are to be read in connection
with

the words “expenses of any current year” and when
so construed mean work which may in one sense be considered new, as
distinguished from strict maintenance, but is nevertheless work which
would tend to continue the district in as good condition as in the
past rather than an extension of the irrigation works or improvement
of the existing water supply. Any question on such classification
of proposed work is subject to determination by the district court
to which the budget is submitted.
Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Short, 80 Wyo. 136, 339 P.2d 403,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1959).

To state it another way, this section, providing for the submission of an itemized estimate of yearly current expenses and hearing thereon after notice, sufficiently protects the freeholders as interested parties and informs the court so that an intelligent determination may be made as to the assessments for such purposes. Any other assessments can be effective only after due hearings based on preliminary engineering report (§

41-7-201

) and commissioners' report (§

41-7-305

). This will inform landowners as to the proposed expenditures, the measure of the prospective benefits, and their assumption of the increased expenses and will simultaneously enable the court to make intelligent decisions thereon. Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Short, 80 Wyo. 136, 339 P.2d 403,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1959).

Stated

in

Casper-Alcova Irrigation Dist. v. Irving, 584 P.2d 1064,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1978).

§ 41-7-403.
Preparation of assessment roll; contents; how apportioned; certification by county commissioners; delivery to county assessors.

It shall be the duty of the commissioners of each irrigation district, on or before the third Monday in July in each year to prepare an assessment roll of said district, which shall contain the name of the owner, together with a description of each lot, tract and easement of land within said district and the aggregate assessments of benefits confirmed by the court against the same; the name of all corporations assessed together with the aggregate assessment levied against such corporations respectively. The assessment roll shall also show the amount assessed against each lot, tract and easement of land, and against each corporation in the district, for current expense and to meet the principal and interest on the indebtedness of the district for the current year. All such assessments to meet the principal and interest on the indebtedness of the district for the current year, shall be apportioned on the aggregate assessment of benefits last confirmed by the court. All such assessments for current expenses shall be based upon irrigable acreage and shall be uniform as to irrigable lands receiving the maximum apportionment of water from said district, and as to irrigable lands receiving less than such maximum apportionment such assessment shall bear the same proportion as the amount of water apportioned to such lands bears to the maximum apportionment of water to other lands in such district. Provided however, that the commissioners of any irrigation district may, in their discretion, provide for a minimum annual assessment for current expense. When such assessment roll is completed it shall be signed by the commissioners of said district, and verified by any one (1) of them. On or before the third Monday in July of each year the commissioners of the irrigation district shall deliver to the county commissioners of the county having jurisdiction of such irrigation district the assessment roll of such district. The county commissioners of said county, immediately upon the receipt of the assessment roll of such district and at the time of making the requisite tax levy for county purposes, shall levy and assess against each lot, tract and easement of land and against each corporation, the respective amounts levied and assessed against the same on said assessment roll. Thereupon the county commissioners shall certify to and deliver said assessment roll to the county assessor of such county, and in case the territory embraced in such district is located in two (2) or more counties a copy of the assessment roll as certified to by the county commissioners of the county having jurisdiction of such district shall be delivered to the assessor of each county in which any of the land of the district is located. Upon receipt of such assessment roll the assessors of the counties embracing any of the lands of such district, shall extend upon the tax roll of such county the respective amounts levied and assessed against each lot, tract and easement of land, and against each corporation as shown by said assessment roll of said districts.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 41; C.S. 1920, § 975; Laws 1923, ch. 14, § 3; 1927, ch. 25, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-726; C.S. 1945, § 71-826; Laws 1953, ch. 45, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-303.

Cross references. —

As to assessment rolls and tax lists generally, see §

39-11-101

et seq.

Minimum charge within district commissioners' discretion. —

The only reasonable interpretation of the proviso contained in the 5th sentence of this section is that while the irrigable-acre-basis still remains the general guideline in the assessment of current expenses (as well as all other expenses connected with the operation of the district), the 1953 amendment which enacted the proviso gave to the district commissioners a discretion to fix some minimum charge that would be paid by all water users without such apportionment. Casper-Alcova Irrigation Dist. v. Irving, 584 P.2d 1064,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1978).

Quoted

in

Biddick v. Laramie Valley Mun. Irrigation Dist., 76 Wyo. 67, 299 P.2d 1059,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(1956).

Cited

in

Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1926).

§ 41-7-404.
Collection; disposition; enforcement.

All irrigation district assessments, except as provided by W.S.

41-7-413

, shall be collected by the same officer and in the same manner and at the same time as state and county taxes are collected and when collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the district, except such assessments, together with interest, penalty and costs thereon, as are collected upon assessments levied for the payment of principal and interest of bonded indebtedness of said district; which funds shall be retained by the county treasurer of the county in which such district is organized, and the principal and interest of all bonded indebtedness of such district shall be paid by such county treasurer from such fund at the place of payment designated in said bonds and interest coupons; provided, that when all bonded indebtedness of any irrigation district is fully paid and retired such funds remaining in the hands of the county treasurer shall be paid to the treasurer of such district, for the benefit of the district; provided, however, the county treasurer, in case of taxes heretofore or hereafter levied, as herein provided, shall receive, in payment of the district bond taxes above mentioned for the year in which said taxes were levied, interest coupons or bonds of said irrigation district, maturing within said year the same as so much lawful money of the United States. Provided, however, that in the case of the nonpayment of any taxes which have heretofore or may hereafter be levied, as above provided, the board of county commissioners, upon application made, shall have the power and it shall be the duty, upon written request of the board of such irrigation district, to order the said treasurer to receive in full payment of the bond fund portion of said taxes the principal amount of said tax levies, payable in bonds or bond interest coupons of said irrigation district at their face value, and maturing within the year in which said tax levies were made, as so much lawful money of the United States and in full payment of the maintenance, operating and current expense portion of any such taxes, such an amount, payable in cash or in warrants of said irrigation district at their face value, as the board of said irrigation district may authorize or approve, and to direct the cancellation and remission of all penalties and interests on such delinquent taxes, except, however, that the cost of any advertising shall be paid in cash. And provided further, that in case of any tax sales heretofore had for the nonpayment of any such taxes, the tax sale certificates of which are held by the county, the board of county commissioners of the county holding such tax sale certificates shall have the power, and it shall be its duty upon the written request of the board of such irrigation district, to sell and assign such tax sale certificates and all its interest in said property represented thereby or acquired therethrough, for the amount of the original tax levy on which said sale was based, and to receive in payment therefor for the bond fund portion thereof, bonds or interest coupons of said irrigation district at the face value thereof maturing within the year in which said tax levies were made, as so much lawful money of the United States, and for the maintenance, operating and current expense portion thereof, such an amount in cash or in warrants of said irrigation district at their face value as the board of said irrigation district may authorize or approve; and to cancel and remit all interest and penalties that may have accrued on said tax certificates, except that the cost of advertising shall be paid in cash. Any bonds, bond interest coupons or warrants of any such irrigation district used in payment of taxes or in the purchase of tax sale certificates, as herein provided, shall together with any interest on such bonds, coupons or warrants, be deemed fully paid and satisfied, and the irrigation district relieved from all obligations thereunder. The commissioners of any irrigation district may elect the treasurer of the county having jurisdiction of such district, treasurer of such district.

The revenue laws of this state for the collecting of taxes on real estate for county purpose, except as herein modified, shall be applicable for the purposes of this act [§§

41-7-101

through

41-7-401

,

41-7-403

through

41-7-412

,

41-7-414

,

41-7-415

], including the payment of interest and enforcement of penalties and forfeitures for delinquent taxes; all penalties and interest on assessments of an irrigation district collected by the county treasurer shall be the property of such district, and shall be turned into the bond interest fund, and all interest and penalties collected on assessments of such district levied for purposes other than bonded indebtedness shall be paid to the treasurer of the district levying such assessment; such payments to be made on or before the fifth day of the month following the date of such collection. In advertising property for sale for delinquent taxes the county treasurer shall show in a separate column in such advertisement the amount of unpaid assessments levied against each lot, tract and easement of land in said district. The county treasurer of any county in which any portion of the land of any irrigation district is located, and at the time of advertising real property for sale for state and county taxes shall include in such advertisement the amount of delinquent irrigation district assessments against each lot, tract or easement of land. At the time and place of sale of real property for state and county taxes the county treasurer shall also separately sell the land for delinquent irrigation district assessments and shall issue separate certificates of sale therefor. In offering such real estate for sale for irrigation district assessments, the county treasurer shall offer the entire tract assessed, and the first bid received in an amount sufficient to pay such assessment, together with interest, penalty and costs, shall be accepted and the treasurer shall not attempt to secure a higher bid. In case no purchaser appears to purchase the land offered for sale for such delinquent assessments the county treasurer shall make an entry on his delinquent tax roll “sold to . . . . . District of . . . . . County, Wyoming”, and shall issue a certificate of purchase to such district. The owner of any tract, lot or easement of land in an irrigation district shall have the right to redeem the said land at any time within eighteen (18) months from the date of sale thereof by the county treasurer, as shown on said certificate by paying therefor the amount for which said land was sold by the county treasurer, together with such penalties and interest as may be provided by law relative to sales of land for delinquent state and county taxes, and in case the owner of any lot, tract or easement of land in any district shall fail to redeem said land from said sale for such assessment, the county treasurer shall issue a deed therefor to the purchaser at said sale, his heirs or assigns. The irrigation district purchasing such land at said tax sale shall have all the rights of natural persons in regard to owning, holding and selling such certificate and including the receipt of a deed, holding the title to real estate and selling and disposing of the same. The commissioners shall in no case sell said land or certificate of purchase for an amount less than the amount for which said land was sold to said district, including interest thereon, unless authorized so to do by the court. The procedure for the issuing of tax deed, including the form of the deed, time of publication and service of notice of intention to apply for deed, shall be the same as is now or may hereafter be provided by law for the issuances of tax deeds by the county treasurer upon the sale of land for state and county taxes, except as herein modified.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 42; C.S. 1920, § 976; Laws 1923, ch. 14, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 122-727; C.S. 1945, § 71-827; W.S. 1957, § 41-304.

Cross references. —

As to collection of delinquent taxes generally, see §§

39-13-107

through

39-13-110

.

Notice. —

Failure to serve notice of purpose of obtaining tax title to land within irrigation district personally on occupant vitiated tax deed. Clinton v. Elder, 40 Wyo. 350, 277 P. 968,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 40 Wyo. 350, 277 P. 968,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1929).

Injunction. —

Where county may disallow claim for expense of advertising tax sale of irrigation district land and set up complete defense to an action brought thereon, injunction to restrain treasurer from advertising such sale is unnecessary. Board of Comm'rs v. Featherstone, 26 Wyo. 1, 174 P. 192,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1918).

Cited

in

Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1926).

§ 41-7-405.
Additional assessments generally.

If any assessment for construction, operation, maintenance or repair that the commissioners shall have reported to the court is a smaller sum than is needed to carry out the purpose for which said assessment has been made, or if in any year an additional sum is necessary to pay the principal or interest on lawful indebtedness of the said irrigation district, further or additional assessments on the lands and persons benefited shall be made by the commissioners of said irrigation district under the order of the court, or presiding judge thereof, upon such notice as the court may direct, which further or additional assessment may be made payable in installments as specified herein, and shall be treated and collected in the same manner as the original assessments confirmed by the court in said irrigation district.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 45; C.S. 1920, § 979; Laws 1923, ch. 14, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 122-729; C.S. 1945, § 71-829; W.S. 1957, § 41-305.

Cross references. —

As to petition for additional funds in connection with assessments, see §

41-7-402

.

Cited

in

Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1926).

§ 41-7-406.
Omissions; effect on other lands; duty of commissioner.

Omission to assess benefits, or to assess for construction, or to make additional assessment, or to make assessment for operation, maintenance or repairs against any land or person which should have been assessed, or to award damages to any one (1) or more tracts of lands or easements in an irrigation district shall neither affect the jurisdiction of the court to confirm the report nor to render the benefits assessed, or the assessments for construction, or additional assessments, or assessments for operation, maintenance, or repairs against other lands, or assessments against any person voidable, but the commissioners of said irrigation district shall thereafter, as soon as they discover the omission, or receive notice thereof, either agree with the omitted parties upon the proper award or assessments and award the damages or make such assessment of benefits or assessments for construction, operation, maintenance or repair, and make such additional assessments against the omitted lands and corporations, and award such damages as shall be just, and report the facts, together with such assessments and awards, to the court.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 46; C.S. 1929, § 980; R.S. 1931, § 122-730; C.S. 1945, § 71-830; W.S. 1957, § 41-306.

Cross references. —

As to omissions in connection with assessments relative to drainage districts, see §§

41-9-247

,

41-9-248

.

If it is not contended
that any report was ever made under §

41-7-307

, this section is inapplicable. —

It seems clear that
§

41-7-406

purports to deal with inadvertent omissions of certain
areas rather than failure to file an assessment of benefits on all
the lands in the district.
Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Short, 80 Wyo. 136, 339 P.2d 403,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1959).

§ 41-7-407.
Omissions; procedures generally.

In case of omission to assess any person or land that should be assessed for benefits, or additional assessment, or to award damages, said omitted party and the owners or person entitled to the possession of omitted land may, in writing, agree with the commissioners of said district that the assessment should be against said land, or against said person, or what said damage should be, and such agreement shall be acknowledged and witnessed as provided above for waivers, and be filed in the court.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 55; C.S. 1920, § 989; R.S. 1931, § 122-740; C.S. 1945, § 71-840; W.S. 1957, § 41-307.

§ 41-7-408.
Borrowing money; bonds as security; indebtedness as lien on assessments.

The commissioners may borrow money, not exceeding the amount of “assessment for construction,” as herein provided, unpaid at the time of borrowing for such purposes, or for the payment of indebtedness they may have lawfully incurred, and may secure the same by notes or bonds bearing interest and not running beyond one (1) year after the last installment of the assessment, on the account of which the money is borrowed, shall fall due, which notes or bonds shall not be sold at less than ninety percent (90%) of their face value, which bonds shall be transferable by delivery to the same extent as negotiable paper of the highest character, and may deliver notes or bonds to the United States to be held and when deemed desirable or when the appraised value of the land in the district is double the bonded indebtedness, sold by it, and the net proceeds received from the notes or bonds applied to the liquidation of contract indebtedness of the district to the United States. Notes or bonds shall be in a form, terms and denominations as may be fixed by the secretary of the interior in carrying out the provisions of the act of congress of June 17, 1902 (32 Stat. 388) and all acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto, or that may be hereafter enacted as amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto, or other acts of congress heretofore or hereafter enacted providing for or permitting the acceptance of the bonds, and which notes or bonds shall not be held to make the commissioners personally liable, but constitute a lien upon the assessments for the repayment of the principal and interest of the notes or bonds. In case any monies derived from bonds sold to pay for the construction, as herein provided, now or hereafter, remains on hand after the work is completed and paid for, and not raised for damages unpaid for, the residue may be used in the maintenance and repair, as in this chapter provided, before making assessment for maintenance and repair.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 47; C.S. 1920, § 981; Laws 1923, ch. 14, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 122-731; C.S. 1945, § 71-831; W.S. 1957, § 41-308; Laws 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1.

Cross references. —

For definition of “assessment for construction,” see §

41-7-305

.

Editor's notes. —

The act of congress of June 17, 1902, referred to above, appears as 43 U.S.C. §§ 372, 373, 383, 391, 392, 411, 419, 421, 431, 432, 434, 439, 461, 498 and 1457.

Power of contract. —

Commissioners having power to borrow money, and issue bonds of the district, clearly had power to enter into contract for the purpose of securing such money and they had right to meet all conditions made by the United States government, at least if not unreasonable, and not in conflict with laws of the state. In re Greybull Valley Irrigation Dist., 52 Wyo. 479, 76 P.2d 339,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 52 Wyo. 479, 76 P.2d 339,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1938).

Limitation on borrowing power. —

Limitation upon power of district to borrow money is an amount “not to exceed the amount due on assessments,” and board cannot be authorized to issue notes or warrants until an assessment has been made and confirmed by the court. In re Bear River Irrigation Dist., 51 Wyo. 343, 65 P.2d 686,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1937).

Quoted

in

Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Short, 80 Wyo. 136, 339 P.2d 403,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(1959).

Cited

in

Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1926).

§ 41-7-409.
Bonds; refunding procedures.

The court may, upon the petition of the commissioners, authorize them to refund a lawful indebtedness of the district now existing or which may hereafter be incurred by taking up and canceling all or a part of its outstanding notes and bonds, as fast as they come due or before, if the holders thereof will surrender the same, and issue in lieu thereof new notes or bonds of the district, payable in a time as the court deems proper, in an amount sufficient to retire all notes and bonds of the district then outstanding and the unpaid accrued interest thereon, together with an amount as the commissioners of the district deem necessary to provide for possible future defaults and delinquencies in the payment of assessments, and bearing interest. For the purpose of providing funds to pay the refunding bonds with interest thereon, the commissioners may levy assessments against the land in the district, but not in excess of the benefits assessed. In the alternative the commissioners may issue refunding bonds in an amount sufficient only to retire all notes and bonds of the district then outstanding and the unpaid accrued interest thereon, and may, if they desire to provide a fund to provide for possible defaults and delinquencies in the payment of assessments, levy from year to year assessments against the land in the district for such purposes, but not in excess of the benefits assessed against the same.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 48; C.S. 1920, § 982; Laws 1923, ch. 14, § 7; R.S. 1931, § 122-732; Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 34, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-832; W.S. 1957, § 41-309; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 35; W.S. 1977, §

41-7-408

; Laws 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1.

§ 41-7-410.
Bonds; effect of change in assessments.

No bonds or other money obligations issued by any irrigation district shall be adversely affected by any subsequent change in assessment of benefits.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 52; C.S. 1920, § 986; R.S. 1931, § 122-737; C.S. 1945, § 71-837; W.S. 1957, § 41-310.

§ 41-7-411.
Damages to landowners to be paid before entry for construction; exceptions; when entry prior to assessment authorized.

The damages allowed to the owners of lands shall be paid or tendered before the commissioners shall be authorized to enter upon the lands, for damage to which the award is made, for the construction of any reservoirs, canals, ditches, or other work proposed thereon. If the owner is unknown or there shall be a contest in regard to the ownership of the lands, or the owner will not receive payment, or there exists a mortgage or other lien against the same, or the commissioners cannot for any other reason pay him, they may deposit the said damages with the clerk of the court, for the benefit of the owner, or parties interested, to be paid or distributed as the court shall direct, and such payment shall have the same effect as the tender to and acceptance of the damages awarded by the true owners of the land. This section shall not, however, prevent said commissioners, their agents, servants, and employees from going upon said lands to do any and all work found necessary prior to making their assessment of benefits and award of damages, and the trial on their report thereof.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 50; C.S. 1920, § 984; R.S. 1931, § 122-735; C.S. 1945, § 71-835; W.S. 1957, § 41-311.

§ 41-7-412.
Advertisement for bids on work exceeding $7,500.00.

In all cases where the work to be done at any one (1) time under the direction of the commissioners will, in their opinion, cost to exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500.00), the same shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder, and the commissioner shall advertise for sealed bids, by notice published in some newspaper published in the county in which the petition is filed, and may advertise in one (1) or more newspapers published elsewhere. If there be no newspaper published in the county in which the petition is filed, they shall advertise in some newspaper published in an adjoining county, which said notice shall particularly set forth the time and place when and where the bids advertised will be opened, the kind of work to be let and the terms of payment. Said commissioners may continue the letting from time to time, if in their judgment the same shall be necessary, and shall reserve the right to reject any and all bids. This section shall not be construed to apply to the employment of superintendent, engineer, attorney or other employee engaged in the general work of the district.

History.

Laws 1920, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 49; C.S. 1920, § 983; R.S. 1931, § 122-734; C.S. 1945, § 71-834; W.S. 1957, § 41-312; 1997, ch. 136, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to public works and contractor's bond generally, see §§

16-6-101

to

16-6-121

.